Washington statutes.
RCW 42.30.035

Minutes—Recording of school district board of directors meetings.

(1) The minutes of all regular and special meetings except executive sessions of such boards, commissions, agencies or authorities shall be promptly recorded and such records shall be open to public inspection.

(2) Except in the case of an emergency as provided for in RCW 42.30.070, and excluding executive sessions, all regular and special meetings of school district boards of directors at which a final action is taken or formal public testimony is accepted shall be audio recorded and such recordings shall be maintained for at least one year. The recording shall include the comments of the directors and the comments of members of the public, if any formal testimony was accepted from the public during the meeting. Subject to the limitations on identifiable records in RCW 42.56.080(1), such recordings must be provided electronically to the public upon request. It is not a violation of this chapter if a school board attempts to record a meeting in good faith and, due to technological issues, a recording is not made or if any or all of a recording is unintelligible. Whenever possible, school districts are encouraged to make the content of school board of directors meetings, or a summary thereof, available in formats accessible to individuals who need communication assistance and in languages other than English.

[ 2023 c 67 s 3; 1953 c 216 s 3. Formerly RCW 42.32.030.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 67: "This act takes effect June 30, 2024." [ 2023 c 67 s 5.]